South Dakota, session 2026, SB89.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. The Executive Board of the Legislative Research Council shall establish the
Emergency Medical Services Funding Task Force. The task force shall:
(1) Examine mechanisms to fund counties and municipalities for the provision of
emergency medical services as an essential service;
(2) Examine policies for ambulance service payments, including reimbursement
standards for out of network emergency medical services;
(3) Seek input from relevant stakeholders on the provision of emergency medical
services as an essential service;
(4) Provide to the executive board, no later than November 1, 2026, a report
containing findings and recommendations for legislative proposals related to the
funding of emergency medical services in this state; and
(5) Review planned expenditures of the Rural Health Transformation program and
evaluate opportunities to incorporate the funds into emergency medical services
funding strategies.
The task force shall meet no more than five times during the 2026 interim. The
task force is dissolved upon the delivery of the task force's report to the executive board.
Section 2. The Emergency Medical Services Funding Task Force consists of:
(1) The chairs of the health and human services committees of the House of
Representatives and the Senate;
(2) The chairs of the taxation committees of the House of Representatives and the
Senate;

26.404.16 2 89
(3) Four members of the House of Representatives, one of whom must be a member
of the minority party, appointed by the Executive Board of the Legislative Research
Council; and
(4) Three members of the Senate, one of whom must be a member of the minority
party, appointed by the executive board.
If the chair of a committee is unable to serve on the task force, the Executive Board
of the Legislative Research Council may appoint another member of the committee to
serve in the chair's place.
SB89 ENROLLED

26.404.16 3 89
An Act to create a task force to study the provision of emergency medical services as an
essential service and the funding thereof.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 89
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 89 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB89 ENROLLED